Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-314
Occupation taxes; how collected;
credited to General Fund.

Occupation
tax or taxes to be paid as provided in sections 21-301 to 21-330 may be recovered by an action in the
name of the state and on collection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the General Fund.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 14, p. 750;

R.S.1913, § 774;

C.S.1922, § 692;

C.S.1929, § 24-1714;

R.S.1943, § 21-314;

Laws 1969, c. 124, § 7, p. 573;

Laws 1988, LB 800, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 247.
January 1, 2017